Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.102.100

Maximization of awards.

(1)(a) The office is directed to maximize the impact of conditional scholarships and loan repayments awarded under this chapter in light of shortage areas and in response to the trending financial needs of the applicant pool.

(b) In maximizing the impact of the awards, the office may adjust the number and amounts of the conditional scholarships and loan repayments made each year. However, the maximum award authorized under this chapter is eight thousand dollars per person, per academic year. Beginning in the 2020-21 academic year, the office may adjust the maximum award by the average rate of resident undergraduate tuition and fee increases at the state universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(2) The allowable uses of a conditional scholarship under this chapter include the cost of attendance as determined by the office, such as tuition, room, board, and books.

(3) The award of a conditional scholarship under this chapter may not result in reduction of a participant's federal or other state financial aid.

(4) The office must make conditional scholarship and loan repayment awards from moneys in the educator conditional scholarship account created in RCW 28B.102.080.

[ 2019 c 295 s 215.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.